Kansas, session 2025-2026, HB2393.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Kansas:
Section 1. K.S.A. 8-2107 is hereby amended to read as follows: 8-
2107. (a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of the uniform act
regulating traffic on highways, when a person is stopped by a police
officer for any of the offenses described in subsection (d) and such person
is not immediately taken before a judge of the district court, the police
officer may require the person stopped, subject to the provisions of
subsection (c), to deposit with the officer a valid Kansas driver's license in
exchange for a receipt therefor issued by such police officer, the form of
which shall be approved by the division of vehicles. Such receipt shall be
recognized as a valid temporary Kansas driver's license authorizing the
operation of a motor vehicle by the person stopped until the date of the
hearing stated on the receipt. The driver's license and a written copy of the
notice to appear shall be delivered by the police officer to the court having
jurisdiction of the offense charged as soon as reasonably possible. If the
hearing on such charge is continued for any reason, the judge may note on
the receipt the date to which such hearing has been continued and such
receipt shall be recognized as a valid temporary Kansas driver's license
until such date, but in no event shall such receipt be recognized as a valid
Kansas driver's license for a period longer than 30 days from the date set
for the original hearing. Any person who has deposited a driver's license
with a police officer under this subsection shall have such license returned
upon final determination of the charge against such person.
(2) In the event the person stopped deposits a valid Kansas driver's
license with the police officer and fails to appear in the district court on the
date set for appearance, or any continuance thereof, and in any event
within 30 days from the date set for the original hearing, the court shall

HB 2393 2
forward such person's driver's license to the division of vehicles with an
appropriate explanation attached thereto. Upon receipt of such person's
driver's license, the division shall suspend such person's privilege to
operate a motor vehicle in this state until such person appears before the
court having jurisdiction of the offense charged, the court makes a final
disposition thereof and notice of such disposition is given by the court to
the division. No new or replacement license shall be issued to any such
person until such notice of disposition has been received by the division.
The provisions of K.S.A. 8-256, and amendments thereto, limiting the
suspension of a license to one year, shall not apply to suspensions for
failure to appear as provided in this subsection.
(b) No person shall apply for a replacement or new driver's license
prior to the return of such person's original license which has been
deposited in lieu of bond under this section. Violation of this subsection is
a class C misdemeanor. The division may suspend such person's driver's
license for a period of not to exceed one year from the date the division
receives notice of the disposition of the person's charge as provided in
subsection (a).
(c) (1) In lieu of depositing a valid Kansas driver's license with the
stopping police officer as provided in subsection (a), the person stopped
may elect to give bond in the amount specified in subsection (d) for the
offense for which the person was stopped. When such person does not
have a valid Kansas driver's license, such person shall give such bond.
Such bond shall be subject to forfeiture if the person stopped does not
appear at the court and at the time specified in the written notice provided
for in K.S.A. 8-2106, and amendments thereto.
(2) Such bond may be a cash bond, a bank card draft from any valid
and unexpired credit card approved by the division of vehicles or
superintendent of the Kansas highway patrol or a guaranteed arrest bond
certificate issued by either a surety company authorized to transact such
business in this state or an automobile club authorized to transact business
in this state by the commissioner of insurance. If any of the approved bank
card issuers redeem the bank card draft at a discounted rate, such discount
shall be charged against the amount designated as the fine for the offense.
If such bond is not forfeited, the amount of the bond less the discount rate
shall be reimbursed to the person providing the bond by the use of a bank
card draft. Any such guaranteed arrest bond certificate shall be signed by
the person to whom it is issued and shall contain a printed statement that
such surety company or automobile club guarantees the appearance of
such person and will, in the event of failure of such person to appear in
court at the time of trial, pay any fine or forfeiture imposed on such person
not to exceed an amount to be stated on such certificate.
(3) Such cash bond shall be taken in the following manner: The

HB 2393 3
police officer shall furnish the person stopped a stamped envelope
addressed to the judge or clerk of the court named in the written notice to
appear and the person shall place in such envelope the amount of the bond,
and in the presence of the police officer shall deposit the same in the
United States mail. After such cash payment, the person stopped need not
sign the written notice to appear, but the police officer shall note the
amount of the bond mailed on the notice to appear form and shall give a
copy of such form to the person. If the person stopped furnishes the police
officer with a guaranteed arrest bond certificate or bank card draft, the
police officer shall give such person a receipt therefor and shall note the
amount of the bond on the notice to appear form and give a copy of such
form to the person stopped. Such person need not sign the written notice to
appear, and the police officer shall present the notice to appear and the
guaranteed arrest bond certificate or bank card draft to the court having
jurisdiction of the offense charged as soon as reasonably possible.
(d) The offenses for which appearance bonds may be required as
provided in subsection (c) and the amounts thereof shall be as follows:
On and after July 1, 1996:
Reckless driving...................................................................................... $82
Driving when privilege is canceled, suspended or revoked...................... 82
Failure to comply with lawful order of officer.......................................... 57
Registration violation (registered for 12,000 pounds or less)................... 52
Registration violation (registered for more than 12,000 pounds)............. 92
No driver's license for the class of vehicle operated or violation
of restrictions........................................................................................ 52
Spilling load on highway........................................................................... 52
Transporting open container of alcoholic liquor or cereal malt
beverage accessible while vehicle in motion..................................... 223
(e) In the event of forfeiture of any bond under this section, $75 of
the amount forfeited shall be regarded as a docket fee in any court having
jurisdiction over the violation of state law.
(f) None of the provisions of this section shall be construed to
conflict with the provisions of the nonresident violator compact.
(g) When a person is stopped by a police officer for any traffic
infraction and the person is a resident of a state which is not a member of
the nonresident violator compact, K.S.A. 8-1219 et seq., and amendments
thereto, or the person is licensed to drive under the laws of a foreign
country, the police officer may require a bond as provided for under
subsection (c). The bond shall be in the amount specified in the uniform
fine schedule in K.S.A. 8-2118(c), and amendments thereto, plus $75
which shall be regarded as a docket fee in any court having jurisdiction
over the violation of state law.
(h) When a person is stopped by a police officer for failure to provide

HB 2393 4
proof of financial security pursuant to K.S.A. 40-3104, and amendments
thereto, and the person is a resident of another state or the person is
licensed to drive under the laws of a foreign country, the police officer
may require a bond as provided for under subsection (c). The bond shall be
in the amount of $75, plus $75 which shall be regarded as a docket fee in
any court having jurisdiction over the violation of state law.
(i) Except as provided further, the docket fee established in this
section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of
the legislature and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to
collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030,
the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $22 per
docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
Sec. 2. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 8-2110 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 8-2110. (a) Failure to comply with a traffic citation means failure
either to: (1) Appear before any district or municipal court in response to a
traffic citation and pay any fine and court costs imposed as ordered by the
court; or (2) otherwise comply with a traffic citation as provided in K.S.A.
8-2118, and amendments thereto. Failure to comply with a traffic citation
is a misdemeanor, regardless of the disposition of the charge for which
such citation was originally issued.
(b) (1) (A) In addition to penalties of law applicable under subsection
(a), when a person fails to comply with a traffic citation, except for any
violations provided in subparagraph (C), the district or municipal court in
which the person should have complied with the citation shall mail notice
to the person that if the person does not appear in district or municipal
court or pay fines, court costs and any penalties as ordered by the court
within 30 days from the date of mailing notice, the division of vehicles
will be notified to suspend the person's driving privileges unless such
person is eligible for restricted driving privileges pursuant to subparagraph
(B). If the person is eligible for restricted driving privileges, the division of
vehicles shall restrict such person's driving privileges pursuant to the terms
set forth in subparagraph (B). The district or municipal court may charge
an additional fee of $5 for mailing such notice. Upon the person's failure to
comply within such 30 days of mailing notice, the district or municipal
court shall electronically notify the division of vehicles unless the district
or municipal court has determined pursuant to a written order that the
person shall fulfill any requirements set forth by the court prior to the
suspension. Failure to abide by the terms of the order shall result in the
court notifying the division of vehicles that the person's license shall be
suspended for the failure to comply with a traffic citation. Upon receipt of
a report of a failure to comply with a traffic citation under this subsection,
pursuant to K.S.A. 8-255, and amendments thereto, the division of

HB 2393 5
vehicles shall notify the violator and suspend the license of the violator
until satisfactory evidence of substantial compliance with the terms of the
traffic citation has been furnished to the informing court unless such
person is eligible for restricted driving privileges pursuant to subparagraph
(B). If the person is eligible for restricted driving privileges, the division of
vehicles shall notify the violator that the person's driving privileges are
restricted pursuant to the terms set forth in subparagraph (B). When the
court determines the person is in substantial compliance with the terms of
the traffic citation, the court shall immediately electronically notify the
division of vehicles of such compliance. Upon receipt of notification of
such compliance from the informing court, the division of vehicles shall
terminate the restriction, suspension or suspension action.
(B) (i) When restricted driving privileges are approved pursuant to
this subsection, the person's driving privileges shall be restricted to driving
only under the following circumstances:
(a) In going to or returning from the person's place of employment or
schooling;
(b) in the course of the person's employment;
(c) in going to or returning from an appointment with a healthcare
provider or during a medical emergency;
(d) in going to and returning from probation or parole meetings, drug
or alcohol counseling or any place the person is required to go by a court;
(e) in going to or returning from dropping off or picking up one or
more children from school or child care;
(f) in going to or returning from purchasing groceries or fuel for their
vehicle; and
(g) in going to or returning from any religious worship service held
by a religious organization.
(ii) A person shall not qualify for restricted driving privileges
pursuant to this subparagraph if such person has been convicted for driving
with a canceled, suspended or revoked license more than three times or if
such person is suspended for reasons other than a failure to comply with a
traffic citation at the time of application. Restricted driving privileges
approved pursuant to this subparagraph shall remain in effect for the lesser
of time of either:
(a) 60 days from the date that the division of vehicles mails notice to
the person of the restricted driving privileges;
(b) the person enters into an agreement with the court regarding the
person's failure to comply; or
(c) the rescission of the restricted driving privileges by the division of
vehicles.
(iii) The division shall rescind restricted driving privileges for any
person authorized pursuant to this subparagraph if the person is found

HB 2393 6
guilty of:
(a) A violation resulting in a license suspension, revocation or
cancellation for reasons other than failure to comply with a traffic citation;
or
(b) operating a motor vehicle in violation of restrictions provided in
clause (i) two or more times.
(iv) A person operating a motor vehicle in violation of restrictions
provided in clause (i) shall be guilty of operating a vehicle in violation of
restrictions as provided in K.S.A. 8-291, and amendments thereto.
(C) (i) Violations of the following sections or violations of
substantially similar offenses under a city ordinance shall not provide the
basis for a violation of this section: K.S.A. 8-1513, 8-1532, 8-1534, 8-
1536, 8-1537, 8-1538, 8-1543, 8-1569, 8-1571, 8-1572, 8-1573, 8-1578, 8-
1578a, 8-1583, 8-1585, 8-1586, 8-1588, 8-1589, 8-1590, 8-1591, 8-1592,
8-15,102, 8-15,108, 8-15,113, 8-1744, 21-5607, 21-5810, 21-5815, 21-
5816, 21-5817, 21-6203, 41-715, 41-727, 66-1330, 68-2106, 75-4510a and
79-34,112, and amendments thereto.
(ii) The provisions of this subparagraph shall be construed and
applied retroactively. A person may petition the district or municipal court
in which the person should have complied with the citation that led to a
prior violation of this section. If the court determines that the person
committed an offense that does not provide the basis for a violation of this
section, as amended by this act, the court shall immediately electronically
notify the division of vehicles. Upon receipt of such notification from the
informing court, the division of vehicles shall terminate any restriction,
suspension or suspension action that resulted from the prior violation of
this section.
(2) (A) In lieu of suspension under paragraph (1), the driver may
submit to the division of vehicles a written request for restricted driving
privileges. The driver may apply and be eligible for restricted driving
privileges pursuant to this paragraph if such driver has previously been
approved for restricted driving privileges pursuant to paragraph (1).
(B) (i) A person whose driving privileges have been revoked solely
for driving a motor vehicle on any highway as defined in K.S.A. 8-1424,
and amendments thereto, of this state at a time when such person's
privilege to do so was canceled, suspended or revoked for failure to
comply with a traffic citation pursuant to this section may submit to the
division of vehicles a written request for restricted driving privileges. A
person shall not qualify for restricted driving privileges pursuant to this
section if such person has been convicted for driving with a canceled,
suspended or revoked license more than three times or if such person is
suspended for reasons other than a failure to comply with a traffic citation
at the time of application. Restricted driving privileges approved pursuant

HB 2393 7
to this subparagraph shall remain in effect unless otherwise rescinded for
the lesser of time of either:
(a) The remainder of the period of time that such person's driving
privileges are revoked; or
(b) three years from the date when the restricted driving privileges
were approved.
(ii) The division shall rescind restricted driving privileges for any
person authorized pursuant to this subparagraph if the person is found
guilty of a violation resulting in a license suspension, revocation or
cancellation for reasons other than failure to comply with a traffic citation.
(iii) A person operating a motor vehicle in violation of restrictions
provided in subparagraph (D) shall be guilty of operating a vehicle in
violation of restrictions as provided in K.S.A. 8-291, and amendments
thereto.
(C) A person whose driver's license has expired during the period
when such person's driver's license has been suspended for failure to pay
fines for traffic citations, the driver may submit to the division of vehicles
a written request for restricted driving privileges. An* person shall not
qualify for restricted driving privileges pursuant to this section unless the
following conditions are met:
(i) The suspended license that expired was issued by the division of
vehicles;
(ii) the suspended license resulted from the individual's failure to
comply with a traffic citation pursuant to subsection (b)(1); and
(iii) the traffic citation that resulted in the failure to comply pursuant
to subsection (b)(1) was issued in this state.
(D) Upon review and approval of the driver's eligibility, the driving
privileges will be restricted by the division of vehicles until the terms of
the traffic citation have been substantially complied with and the court
shall immediately electronically notify the division of vehicles of such
compliance. If the driver fails to substantially comply with the traffic
citation, the driving privileges will be suspended by the division of
vehicles until the court determines the person has substantially complied
with the terms of the traffic citation and the court shall immediately
electronically notify the division of vehicles of such substantial
compliance. Upon receipt of notification of such compliance from the
informing court, the division of vehicles shall terminate the suspension
action. When restricted driving privileges are approved pursuant to this
section, the person's driving privileges shall be restricted to driving only
under the following circumstances:
(i) In going to or returning from the person's place of employment or
schooling;
(ii) in the course of the person's employment;

HB 2393 8
(iii) in going to or returning from an appointment with a health care
provider or during a medical emergency;
(iv) in going to and returning from probation or parole meetings, drug
or alcohol counseling or any place the person is required to go by a court;
(v) in going to or returning from dropping off or picking up one or
more children from school or child care;
(vi) in going to or returning from purchasing groceries or fuel for
their vehicle; and
(vii) in going to or returning from any religious worship service held
by a religious organization.
(c) Except as provided in subsection (d), when the district or
municipal court notifies the division of vehicles of a failure to comply with
a traffic citation pursuant to subsection (b), the court shall assess a
reinstatement fee of $100. Such reinstatement fee shall be in addition to
any fine, restricted driving privilege application fee, district or municipal
court costs and other penalties. The court shall remit all reinstatement fees
to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state
treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury and shall
credit the first $15 of such reinstatement fee to the state general fund and
of the remaining amount, 29.41% of such moneys to the division of
vehicles operating fund, 22.06% to the community alcoholism and
intoxication programs fund created by K.S.A. 41-1126, and amendments
thereto, 7.36% to the juvenile alternatives to detention fund created by
K.S.A. 79-4803, and amendments thereto, and 41.17% to the state general
fund.
(d) The district court or municipal court shall waive the reinstatement
fee provided for in subsection (c), if the failure to comply with a traffic
citation was the result of such person enlisting in or being drafted into the
armed services of the United States, being called into service as a member
of a reserve component of the military service of the United States, or
volunteering for such active duty, or being called into service as a member
of the state of Kansas national guard, or volunteering for such active duty,
and being absent from Kansas because of such military service.
(e) (1) A person who is assessed a reinstatement fee pursuant to
subsection (c) may petition the court that assessed the fee at any time to
waive payment of the fee, any additional charge imposed pursuant to
subsection (f), or any portion thereof. If it appears to the satisfaction of the
court that payment of the amount due will impose manifest hardship on the
person or the person's immediate family, the court may waive payment of
all or part of the amount due or modify the method of payment.
(2) A person who is assessed a fine or court costs for a traffic citation
may petition the court that assessed the fine or costs at any time to waive

HB 2393 9
payment of the fine or costs, or any portion thereof. If it appears to the
satisfaction of the court that payment of the amount due will impose
manifest hardship on the person or the person's immediate family, the
court may waive payment of all or part of the amount due or modify the
method of payment.
(3) The clerk of the district court and the clerk of the municipal court
shall make forms available to any person seeking to petition the court to
waive or reduce traffic fines, court costs or reinstatement fees.
(f) Except as provided further, the reinstatement fee established in
this section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for such reinstatement. Such fee shall only be established by an
act of the legislature and no other authority is established by law or
otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June
30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to
exceed $22 per reinstatement fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial
personnel.
(g) (1) Prior to issuing an order pursuant to this section that notifies
the division of vehicles to restrict or suspend a person's driving privileges,
the court shall consider:
(A) Waiver or reduction of fees, fines and court costs and allowing
for payment plans for any fees, fines and court costs; and
(B) alternative requirements in lieu of restriction or suspension of
driving privileges, including, but not limited to, alcohol or drug treatment
or community service.
(2) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require the court
to make written findings or written payment plan orders.
(h) (1) Any conviction for a failure to comply pursuant to this section
shall not be considered by the district or municipal court or the division of
vehicles in determining suspended or restricted driving privileges if such
conviction is more than five years old.
(2) After the expiration of five years from the date of conviction, the
division shall notify by mail any persons whose driving privileges were
suspended or restricted and have not since been restored. The division
shall notify the person that the person may be eligible for driving
privileges as a result of the expiration of the five years from the conviction
for the failure to comply.
(3) The provisions of this subsection shall be construed and applied
retroactively.
(i) As used in this section, "substantial compliance" or "substantially
complied" means the person has followed the orders of the court involving
payments of fines, court costs and any penalties and has not failed
substantially in making payments or satisfying the terms of the court order.
Sec. 3. K.S.A. 20-3021 is hereby amended to read as follows: 20-

HB 2393 10
3021. (a) (1) On and after July 1, 2014, Any party filing an appeal with the
court of appeals shall pay a fee in the amount of $145 to the clerk of the
supreme court.
(2) On and after July 1, 2014, Any party filing an appeal with the
supreme court shall pay a fee in the amount of $145 to the clerk of the
supreme court.
(b) A poverty affidavit may be filed in lieu of a fee as established in
K.S.A. 60-2001, and amendments thereto.
(c) The fee shall be the only costs assessed in each case to services of
the clerk of the supreme court. The clerk of the supreme court shall remit
all revenues received from this section to the state treasurer, in accordance
with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments thereto, for
deposit in the state treasury. The fee shall be disbursed in accordance with
K.S.A. 20-362, and amendments thereto.
(d) Except as provided further, the fee established in this section shall
be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee collected for the
docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of the legislature
and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to collect a fee.
On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme
court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $10 per fee, to fund
the costs of non-judicial personnel.
(e) The state of Kansas and all municipalities in this state, as defined
in K.S.A. 12-105a, and amendments thereto, shall be exempt from paying
such fee.
Sec. 4. K.S.A. 21-6614 is hereby amended to read as follows: 21-
6614. (a) (1) Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f), any
person convicted in this state of a traffic infraction, cigarette or tobacco
infraction, misdemeanor or a class D or E felony, or for crimes committed
on or after July 1, 1993, any nongrid felony or felony ranked in severity
levels 6 through 10 of the nondrug grid, or for crimes committed on or
after July 1, 1993, but prior to July 1, 2012, any felony ranked in severity
level 4 of the drug grid, or for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2012,
any felony ranked in severity level 5 of the drug grid may petition the
convicting court for the expungement of such conviction or related arrest
records if three or more years have elapsed since the person: (A) Satisfied
the sentence imposed; or (B) was discharged from probation, a community
correctional services program, parole, postrelease supervision, conditional
release or a suspended sentence.
(2) Except as provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f), any
person who has fulfilled the terms of a diversion agreement may petition
the district court for the expungement of such diversion agreement and
related arrest records if three or more years have elapsed since the terms of
the diversion agreement were fulfilled.

HB 2393 11
(3) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a)(1), and except as
provided in subsections (b), (c), (d), (e) and (f), any person who has
completed the requirements of a specialty court program established
pursuant to K.S.A. 20-173, and amendments thereto, may petition the
district court for the expungement of the conviction and related arrest
records. The court may waive all or part of the docket fee imposed for
filing a petition pursuant to this subsection.
(b) Any person convicted of prostitution, as defined in K.S.A. 21-
3512, prior to its repeal, convicted of a violation of K.S.A. 21-6419, and
amendments thereto, or who entered into a diversion agreement in lieu of
further criminal proceedings for such violation, may petition the
convicting court for the expungement of such conviction or diversion
agreement and related arrest records if:
(1) One or more years have elapsed since the person satisfied the
sentence imposed or the terms of a diversion agreement or was discharged
from probation, a community correctional services program, parole,
postrelease supervision, conditional release or a suspended sentence; and
(2) such person can prove they were acting under coercion caused by
the act of another. For purposes of this subsection, "coercion" means:
Threats of harm or physical restraint against any person; a scheme, plan or
pattern intended to cause a person to believe that failure to perform an act
would result in bodily harm or physical restraint against any person; or the
abuse or threatened abuse of the legal process.
(c) Except as provided in subsections (e) and (f), no person may
petition for expungement until five or more years have elapsed since the
person satisfied the sentence imposed or the terms of a diversion
agreement or was discharged from probation, a community correctional
services program, parole, postrelease supervision, conditional release or a
suspended sentence, if such person was convicted of a class A, B or C
felony, or for crimes committed on or after July 1, 1993, if convicted of an
off-grid felony or any felony ranked in severity levels 1 through 5 of the
nondrug grid, or for crimes committed on or after July 1, 1993, but prior to
July 1, 2012, any felony ranked in severity levels 1 through 3 of the drug
grid, or for crimes committed on or after July 1, 2012, any felony ranked
in severity levels 1 through 4 of the drug grid, or:
(1) Vehicular homicide, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3405, prior to its
repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5406, and amendments thereto, or as prohibited by
any law of another state that is in substantial conformity with that statute;
(2) driving while the privilege to operate a motor vehicle on the
public highways of this state has been canceled, suspended or revoked, as
prohibited by K.S.A. 8-262, and amendments thereto, or as prohibited by
any law of another state that is in substantial conformity with that statute;
(3) perjury resulting from a violation of K.S.A. 8-261a, and

HB 2393 12
amendments thereto, or resulting from the violation of a law of another
state that is in substantial conformity with that statute;
(4) violating the provisions of K.S.A. 8-142 Fifth, and amendments
thereto, relating to fraudulent applications or violating the provisions of a
law of another state that is in substantial conformity with that statute;
(5) any crime punishable as a felony wherein a motor vehicle was
used in the perpetration of such crime;
(6) failing to stop at the scene of an accident and perform the duties
required by K.S.A. 8-1603, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 8-1602 or 8-1604,
and amendments thereto, or required by a law of another state that is in
substantial conformity with those statutes;
(7) violating the provisions of K.S.A. 40-3104, and amendments
thereto, relating to motor vehicle liability insurance coverage; or
(8) a violation of K.S.A. 21-3405b, prior to its repeal.
(d) (1) No person may petition for expungement until five or more
years have elapsed since the person satisfied the sentence imposed or the
terms of a diversion agreement or was discharged from probation, a
community correctional services program, parole, postrelease supervision,
conditional release or a suspended sentence, if such person was convicted
of a first violation of K.S.A. 8-1567, and amendments thereto, including
any diversion for such violation.
(2) No person may petition for expungement until 10 or more years
have elapsed since the person satisfied the sentence imposed or was
discharged from probation, a community correctional services program,
parole, postrelease supervision, conditional release or a suspended
sentence, if such person was convicted of a second or subsequent violation
of K.S.A. 8-1567, and amendments thereto.
(3) Except as provided further, the provisions of this subsection shall
apply to all violations committed on or after July 1, 2006. The provisions
of subsection (d)(2) shall not apply to violations committed on or after
July 1, 2014, but prior to July 1, 2015.
(e) There shall be no expungement of convictions for the following
offenses or of convictions for an attempt to commit any of the following
offenses:
(1) Rape, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3502, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A.
21-5503, and amendments thereto;
(2) indecent liberties with a child or aggravated indecent liberties
with a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3503 or 21-3504, prior to their repeal,
or K.S.A. 21-5506, and amendments thereto;
(3) criminal sodomy, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3505(a)(2) or (a)(3),
prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5504(a)(3) or (a)(4), and amendments
thereto;
(4) aggravated criminal sodomy, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3506, prior

HB 2393 13
to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5504, and amendments thereto;
(5) indecent solicitation of a child or aggravated indecent solicitation
of a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3510 or 21-3511, prior to their repeal,
or K.S.A. 21-5508, and amendments thereto;
(6) sexual exploitation of a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3516, prior
to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5510, and amendments thereto;
(7) internet trading in child pornography or aggravated internet
trading in child pornography, as defined in K.S.A. 21-5514, and
amendments thereto;
(8) aggravated incest, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3603, prior to its
repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5604, and amendments thereto;
(9) endangering a child or aggravated endangering a child, as defined
in K.S.A. 21-3608 or 21-3608a, prior to their repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5601,
and amendments thereto;
(10) abuse of a child, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3609, prior to its repeal,
or K.S.A. 21-5602, and amendments thereto;
(11) capital murder, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3439, prior to its repeal,
or K.S.A. 21-5401, and amendments thereto;
(12) murder in the first degree, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3401, prior to
its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5402, and amendments thereto;
(13) murder in the second degree, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3402, prior
to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5403, and amendments thereto;
(14) voluntary manslaughter, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3403, prior to
its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5404, and amendments thereto;
(15) involuntary manslaughter, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3404, prior to
its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5405, and amendments thereto;
(16) sexual battery, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3517, prior to its repeal,
or K.S.A. 21-5505, and amendments thereto, when the victim was less
than 18 years of age at the time the crime was committed;
(17) aggravated sexual battery, as defined in K.S.A. 21-3518, prior to
its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5505, and amendments thereto;
(18) a violation of K.S.A. 8-2,144, and amendments thereto,
including any diversion for such violation; or
(19) any conviction for any offense in effect at any time prior to July
1, 2011, that is comparable to any offense as provided in this subsection.
(f) Except as provided in K.S.A. 22-4908, and amendments thereto,
for any offender who is required to register as provided in the Kansas
offender registration act, K.S.A. 22-4901 et seq., and amendments thereto,
there shall be no expungement of any conviction or any part of the
offender's criminal record while the offender is required to register as
provided in the Kansas offender registration act.
(g) (1) When a petition for expungement is filed, the court shall set a
date for a hearing of such petition and shall cause notice of such hearing to

HB 2393 14
be given to the prosecutor and the arresting law enforcement agency. The
petition shall state the:
(A) Defendant's full name;
(B) full name of the defendant at the time of arrest, conviction or
diversion, if different than the defendant's current name;
(C) defendant's sex, race and date of birth;
(D) crime for which the defendant was arrested, convicted or
diverted;
(E) date of the defendant's arrest, conviction or diversion; and
(F) identity of the convicting court, arresting law enforcement
authority or diverting authority.
(2) Except as otherwise provided by law, a petition for expungement
shall be accompanied by a docket fee in the amount of $176. On and after
July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may
impose a charge, not to exceed $19 per case, to fund the costs of non-
judicial personnel. The charge established in this section shall be the only
fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee collected for the case. Such
charge shall only be established by an act of the legislature and no other
authority is established by law or otherwise to collect a fee.
(3) All petitions for expungement shall be docketed in the original
criminal action. Any person who may have relevant information about the
petitioner may testify at the hearing. The court may inquire into the
background of the petitioner and shall have access to any reports or
records relating to the petitioner that are on file with the secretary of
corrections or the prisoner review board.
(h) At the hearing on the petition, the court shall order the petitioner's
arrest record, conviction or diversion expunged if the court finds that:
(1) (A) The petitioner has not been convicted of a felony in the past
two years and no proceeding involving any such crime is presently
pending or being instituted against the petitioner if the petition is filed
under subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2); or
(B) no proceeding involving a felony is presently pending or being
instituted against the petitioner if the petition is filed under subsection (a)
(3);
(2) the circumstances and behavior of the petitioner warrant the
expungement;
(3) the expungement is consistent with the public welfare; and
(4) with respect to petitions seeking expungement of a felony
conviction, possession of a firearm by the petitioner is not likely to pose a
threat to the safety of the public.
(i) When the court has ordered an arrest record, conviction or
diversion expunged, the order of expungement shall state the information
required to be contained in the petition. The clerk of the court shall send a

HB 2393 15
certified copy of the order of expungement to the Kansas bureau of
investigation that shall notify the federal bureau of investigation, the
secretary of corrections and any other criminal justice agency that may
have a record of the arrest, conviction or diversion. If the case was
appealed from municipal court, the clerk of the district court shall send a
certified copy of the order of expungement to the municipal court. The
municipal court shall order the case expunged once the certified copy of
the order of expungement is received. After the order of expungement is
entered, the petitioner shall be treated as not having been arrested,
convicted or diverted of the crime, except that:
(1) Upon conviction for any subsequent crime, the conviction that
was expunged may be considered as a prior conviction in determining the
sentence to be imposed;
(2) the petitioner shall disclose that the arrest, conviction or diversion
occurred if asked about previous arrests, convictions or diversions:
(A) In any application for licensure as a private detective, private
detective agency, certification as a firearms trainer pursuant to K.S.A. 75-
7b21, and amendments thereto, or employment as a detective with a
private detective agency, as defined by K.S.A. 75-7b01, and amendments
thereto; as security personnel with a private patrol operator, as defined by
K.S.A. 75-7b01, and amendments thereto; or with an institution, as defined
in K.S.A. 76-12a01, and amendments thereto, of the Kansas department
for aging and disability services;
(B) in any application for admission, or for an order of reinstatement,
to the practice of law in this state;
(C) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications for
employment with the Kansas lottery or for work in sensitive areas within
the Kansas lottery as deemed appropriate by the executive director of the
Kansas lottery;
(D) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications for executive
director of the Kansas racing and gaming commission, for employment
with the commission or for work in sensitive areas in parimutuel racing as
deemed appropriate by the executive director of the commission, or to aid
in determining qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure by the
commission;
(E) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications for the
following under the Kansas expanded lottery act: (i) Lottery gaming
facility manager or prospective manager, racetrack gaming facility
manager or prospective manager, licensee or certificate holder; or (ii) an
officer, director, employee, owner, agent or contractor thereof;
(F) upon application for a commercial driver's license under K.S.A.
8-2,125 through 8-2,142, and amendments thereto;
(G) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications to be an

HB 2393 16
employee of the state gaming agency;
(H) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications to be an
employee of a tribal gaming commission or to hold a license issued
pursuant to a tribal-state gaming compact;
(I) in any application for registration as a broker-dealer, agent,
investment adviser or investment adviser representative all as defined in
K.S.A. 17-12a102, and amendments thereto;
(J) in any application for employment as a law enforcement officer as
defined in K.S.A. 22-2202 or 74-5602, and amendments thereto; or
(K) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications for a license to
act as a bail enforcement agent pursuant to K.S.A. 75-7e01 through 75-
7e09, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 50-6,141, and
amendments thereto;
(3) the court, in the order of expungement, may specify other
circumstances under which the conviction is to be disclosed;
(4) the conviction may be disclosed in a subsequent prosecution for
an offense that requires as an element of such offense a prior conviction of
the type expunged; and
(5) upon commitment to the custody of the secretary of corrections,
any previously expunged record in the possession of the secretary of
corrections may be reinstated and the expungement disregarded, and the
record continued for the purpose of the new commitment.
(j) Whenever a person is convicted of a crime, pleads guilty and pays
a fine for a crime, is placed on parole, postrelease supervision or
probation, is assigned to a community correctional services program, is
granted a suspended sentence or is released on conditional release, the
person shall be informed of the ability to expunge the arrest records or
conviction. Whenever a person enters into a diversion agreement, the
person shall be informed of the ability to expunge the diversion.
(k) (1) Subject to the disclosures required pursuant to subsection (i),
in any application for employment, license or other civil right or privilege,
or any appearance as a witness, a person whose arrest records, conviction
or diversion of a crime has been expunged under this statute may state that
such person has never been arrested, convicted or diverted of such crime.
(2) A person whose arrest record, conviction or diversion of a crime
that resulted in such person being prohibited by state or federal law from
possessing a firearm has been expunged under this statute shall be deemed
to have had such person's right to keep and bear arms fully restored. This
restoration of rights shall include, but not be limited to, the right to use,
transport, receive, purchase, transfer and possess firearms. The provisions
of this paragraph shall apply to all orders of expungement, including any
orders issued prior to July 1, 2021.
(l) Whenever the record of any arrest, conviction or diversion has

HB 2393 17
been expunged under the provisions of this section or under the provisions
of any other existing or former statute, the custodian of the records of
arrest, conviction, diversion and incarceration relating to that crime shall
not disclose the existence of such records, except when requested by:
(1) The person whose record was expunged;
(2) a private detective agency or a private patrol operator, and the
request is accompanied by a statement that the request is being made in
conjunction with an application for employment with such agency or
operator by the person whose record has been expunged;
(3) a court, upon a showing of a subsequent conviction of the person
whose record has been expunged;
(4) the secretary for aging and disability services, or a designee of the
secretary, for the purpose of obtaining information relating to employment
in an institution, as defined in K.S.A. 76-12a01, and amendments thereto,
of the Kansas department for aging and disability services of any person
whose record has been expunged;
(5) a person entitled to such information pursuant to the terms of the
expungement order;
(6) a prosecutor, and such request is accompanied by a statement that
the request is being made in conjunction with a prosecution of an offense
that requires a prior conviction as one of the elements of such offense;
(7) the supreme court, the clerk or disciplinary administrator thereof,
the state board for admission of attorneys or the state board for discipline
of attorneys, and the request is accompanied by a statement that the
request is being made in conjunction with an application for admission, or
for an order of reinstatement, to the practice of law in this state by the
person whose record has been expunged;
(8) the Kansas lottery, and the request is accompanied by a statement
that the request is being made to aid in determining qualifications for
employment with the Kansas lottery or for work in sensitive areas within
the Kansas lottery as deemed appropriate by the executive director of the
Kansas lottery;
(9) the governor or the Kansas racing and gaming commission, or a
designee of the commission, and the request is accompanied by a
statement that the request is being made to aid in determining
qualifications for executive director of the commission, for employment
with the commission, for work in sensitive areas in parimutuel racing as
deemed appropriate by the executive director of the commission or for
licensure, renewal of licensure or continued licensure by the commission;
(10) the Kansas racing and gaming commission, or a designee of the
commission, and the request is accompanied by a statement that the
request is being made to aid in determining qualifications of the following
under the Kansas expanded lottery act: (A) Lottery gaming facility

HB 2393 18
managers and prospective managers, racetrack gaming facility managers
and prospective managers, licensees and certificate holders; and (B) their
officers, directors, employees, owners, agents and contractors;
(11) the Kansas sentencing commission;
(12) the state gaming agency, and the request is accompanied by a
statement that the request is being made to aid in determining
qualifications: (A) To be an employee of the state gaming agency; or (B)
to be an employee of a tribal gaming commission or to hold a license
issued pursuant to a tribal-gaming compact;
(13) the Kansas securities commissioner or a designee of the
commissioner, and the request is accompanied by a statement that the
request is being made in conjunction with an application for registration as
a broker-dealer, agent, investment adviser or investment adviser
representative by such agency and the application was submitted by the
person whose record has been expunged;
(14) the Kansas commission on peace officers' standards and training
and the request is accompanied by a statement that the request is being
made to aid in determining certification eligibility as a law enforcement
officer pursuant to K.S.A. 74-5601 et seq., and amendments thereto;
(15) a law enforcement agency and the request is accompanied by a
statement that the request is being made to aid in determining eligibility
for employment as a law enforcement officer as defined by K.S.A. 22-
2202, and amendments thereto;
(16) (A) the attorney general and the request is accompanied by a
statement that the request is being made to aid in determining
qualifications for a license to act as a bail enforcement agent pursuant to
K.S.A. 75-7e01 through 75-7e09, and amendments thereto, and K.S.A.
2024 Supp. 50-6,141, and amendments thereto; or
(B) the attorney general for any other purpose authorized by law,
except that an expungement record shall not be the basis for denial of a
license to carry a concealed handgun under the personal and family
protection act; or
(17) the Kansas bureau of investigation, for the purpose of
completing a person's criminal history record information within the
central repository, in accordance with K.S.A. 22-4701 et seq., and
amendments thereto.
(m) (1) The provisions of subsection (l)(17) shall apply to records
created prior to, on and after July 1, 2011.
(2) Upon the issuance of an order of expungement that resulted in the
restoration of a person's right to keep and bear arms, the Kansas bureau of
investigation shall report to the federal bureau of investigation that such
expunged record be withdrawn from the national instant criminal
background check system. The Kansas bureau of investigation shall

HB 2393 19
include such order of expungement in the person's criminal history record
for purposes of documenting the restoration of such person's right to keep
and bear arms.
Sec. 5. K.S.A. 22-2410 is hereby amended to read as follows: 22-
2410. (a) (1) Any person who has been arrested in this state may petition
the district court for the expungement of such arrest record.
(2) (A) If a person has been arrested in this state as a result of
mistaken identity or as a result of another person using the identifying
information of the named person, and the charge against the named person
is dismissed or not prosecuted, the prosecuting attorney or other judicial
officer who ordered the dismissal or declined to prosecute shall provide
notice to the court of such action and petition the district court for the
expungement of such arrest record, and the court shall order the arrest
record and subsequent court proceedings, if any, expunged and purged
from all applicable state and federal systems pursuant to subsection (d).
(B) For purposes of this section, the term "mistaken identity" means
the erroneous arrest of a person for a crime as a result of misidentification
by a witness or law enforcement, confusion on the part of a witness or law
enforcement as to the identity of the person who committed the crime,
misinformation provided to law enforcement as to the identity of the
person who committed the crime or some other mistake on the part of a
witness or law enforcement as to the identity of the person who committed
the crime. "Mistaken identity" shall not include any situation in which an
arrestee intentionally provides false information to law enforcement
officials in an attempt to conceal such person's identity.
(b) (1) When a petition for expungement is filed pursuant to
subsection (a)(1), the court shall set a date for hearing on such petition and
shall cause notice of such hearing to be given to the prosecuting attorney
and the arresting law enforcement agency. Any person who may have
relevant information about the petitioner may testify at the hearing. The
court may inquire into the background of the petitioner.
(2) When a petition for expungement is filed pursuant to subsection
(a)(1) or (a)(2), the official court file shall be separated from the other
records of the court, and shall be disclosed only to a judge of the court and
members of the staff of the court designated by a judge of the district
court, the prosecuting attorney, the arresting law enforcement agency, or
any other person when authorized by a court order, subject to any
conditions imposed by the order.
(3) (A) Except as otherwise provided by law, a petition for
expungement pursuant to subsection (a)(1) shall be accompanied by a
docket fee in the amount of $176. Except as provided further, the docket
fee established in this section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in
the nature of a fee collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be

HB 2393 20
established by an act of the legislature and no other authority is established
by law or otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025,
through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an additional
charge, not to exceed $19 per docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial
personnel.
(B) No surcharge or fee shall be imposed to any person filing a
petition pursuant to subsection (a)(1), who was arrested as a result of being
a victim of identity theft under K.S.A. 21-4018, prior to its repeal, or
K.S.A. 21-6107(a), and amendments thereto, or who has had criminal
charges dismissed because a court has found that there was no probable
cause for the arrest, the petitioner was found not guilty in court
proceedings or the charges have been dismissed.
(4) The petition filed pursuant to subsection (a)(1) or (a)(2) shall
state:
(A) The petitioner's full name;
(B) the full name of the petitioner at the time of arrest, if different
than the petitioner's current name;
(C) the petitioner's sex, race and date of birth;
(D) the crime for which the petitioner was arrested;
(E) the date of the petitioner's arrest; and
(F) the identity of the arresting law enforcement agency.
(c) At the hearing on a petition for expungement pursuant to
subsection (a)(1), the court shall order the arrest record and subsequent
court proceedings, if any, expunged upon finding:
(1) The arrest occurred because of mistaken identity;
(2) a court has found that there was no probable cause for the arrest;
(3) the petitioner was found not guilty in court proceedings; or
(4) the expungement would be in the best interests of justice and: (A)
Charges have been dismissed; or (B) no charges have been or are likely to
be filed.
(d) (1) When the court has ordered expungement of an arrest record
and subsequent court proceedings, if any, on a petition for expungement
pursuant to subsection (a)(1), the order shall state the information required
to be stated in the petition and shall state the grounds for expungement
under subsection (c). The clerk of the court shall send a certified copy of
the order to the Kansas bureau of investigation which shall notify the
federal bureau of investigation, the secretary of corrections and any other
criminal justice agency which may have a record of the arrest. If the case
was appealed from municipal court, the clerk of the district court shall
send a certified copy of the order of expungement to the municipal court.
The municipal court shall order the case expunged once the certified copy
of the order of expungement is received. If an order of expungement is
entered, the petitioner pursuant to subsection (a)(1) shall be treated as not

HB 2393 21
having been arrested.
(2) When the court has ordered expungement of arrest records on a
petition for expungement pursuant to subsection (a)(2), the order shall
state the information required to be stated in the petition and shall state the
grounds for expungement under subsection (a)(2). The order shall also
direct the Kansas bureau of investigation to purge the arrest information
from the criminal justice information system central repository and all
applicable state and federal databases. The clerk of the court shall send a
certified copy of the order to the Kansas bureau of investigation, which
shall carry out the order and shall notify the federal bureau of
investigation, the secretary of corrections and any other criminal justice
agency that may have a record of the arrest. If an order of expungement is
entered, the person eligible for mandatory expungement pursuant to
subsection (a)(2) shall be treated as not having been arrested.
(e) If the ground for expungement is as provided in subsection (c)(4),
the court shall determine whether, in the interests of public welfare, the
records should be available for any of the following purposes:
(1) In any application for employment as a detective with a private
detective agency, as defined in K.S.A. 75-7b01, and amendments thereto;
as security personnel with a private patrol operator, as defined by K.S.A.
75-7b01, and amendments thereto; or with an institution, as defined in
K.S.A. 76-12a01, and amendments thereto, of the Kansas department for
aging and disability services;
(2) in any application for admission, or for an order of reinstatement,
to the practice of law in this state;
(3) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications for
employment with the Kansas lottery or for work in sensitive areas within
the Kansas lottery as deemed appropriate by the executive director of the
Kansas lottery;
(4) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications for executive
director of the Kansas racing commission, for employment with the
commission or for work in sensitive areas in parimutuel racing as deemed
appropriate by the executive director of the commission, or to aid in
determining qualifications for licensure or renewal of licensure by the
commission;
(5) in any application for a commercial driver's license under K.S.A.
8-2,125 through 8-2,142, and amendments thereto;
(6) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications to be an
employee of the state gaming agency;
(7) to aid in determining the petitioner's qualifications to be an
employee of a tribal gaming commission or to hold a license issued
pursuant to a tribal-state gaming compact; or
(8) in any other circumstances which the court deems appropriate.

HB 2393 22
(f) The court shall make all expunged records and related information
in such court's possession, created prior to, on and after July 1, 2011,
available to the Kansas bureau of investigation for the purposes of:
(1) Completing a person's criminal history record information within
the central repository in accordance with K.S.A. 22-4701 et seq., and
amendments thereto; or
(2) providing information or documentation to the federal bureau of
investigation, in connection with the national instant criminal background
check system, to determine a person's qualification to possess a firearm.
(g) Subject to any disclosures required under subsection (e), in any
application for employment, license or other civil right or privilege, or any
appearance as a witness, a person whose arrest records have been
expunged as provided in this section may state that such person has never
been arrested.
(h) Whenever a person's arrest records have been expunged as
provided in this section, the custodian of the records of arrest,
incarceration due to arrest or court proceedings related to the arrest, shall
not disclose the arrest or any information related to the arrest, except as
directed by the order of expungement or when requested by the person
whose arrest record was expunged.
(i) The docket fee collected at the time the petition for expungement
is filed pursuant to subsection (a)(1) shall be disbursed in accordance with
K.S.A. 20-362, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 6. K.S.A. 23-2510 is hereby amended to read as follows: 23-
2510. (a) The judge or clerk of the district court shall collect from the
applicant for a marriage license a fee of $59.
(b) The clerk of the court shall remit all fees prescribed by this
section to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A.
75-4215, and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance,
the state treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury. Of
each remittance, the state treasurer shall credit 38.98% to the protection
from abuse fund, 15.19% to the family and children trust account of the
family and children investment fund created by K.S.A. 38-1808, and
amendments thereto, 16.95% to the crime victims assistance fund created
by K.S.A. 74-7334, and amendments thereto, and the remainder to the
state general fund.
(c) Except as provided further, the marriage license fee established in
this section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for a marriage license. Such fee shall only be established by an
act of the legislature and no other authority is established by law or
otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June
30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to
exceed $26.50 per marriage license fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial

HB 2393 23
personnel.
Sec. 7. K.S.A. 28-170 is hereby amended to read as follows: 28-170.
(a) The docket fee prescribed by K.S.A. 60-2001, and amendments thereto,
and the fees for service of process, shall be the only costs assessed for
services of the clerk of the district court and the sheriff in any case filed
under chapter 60 or chapter 61 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto, except that no fee shall be charged for an action filed
under K.S.A. 60-3101 et seq., and under K.S.A. 60-31a01 et seq., and
amendments thereto. For services in other matters in which no other fee is
prescribed by statute, the following fees shall be charged and collected by
the clerk. Only one fee shall be charged for each bond, lien or judgment:
1. For filing, entering and releasing a bond, mechanic's lien, notice of
intent to perform, personal property tax judgment or any judgment on
which execution process cannot be issued .........................................$14
2. For filing, entering and releasing a judgment of a court of this state on
which execution or other process can be issued ................................ $24
3. For a certificate, or for copying or certifying any paper or writ, such fee
as shall be prescribed by the district court.
(b) The fees for entries, certificates and other papers required in
naturalization cases shall be those prescribed by the federal government
and, when collected, shall be disbursed as prescribed by the federal
government. The clerk of the court shall remit to the state treasurer at least
monthly all moneys received from fees prescribed by subsection (a) or (b)
or received for any services performed which may be required by law. The
state treasurer shall deposit the remittance in the state treasury and credit
the entire amount to the state general fund.
(c) In actions pursuant to the revised Kansas code for care of
children, K.S.A. 38-2201 et seq., and amendments thereto, the revised
Kansas juvenile justice code, K.S.A. 38-2301 et seq., and amendments
thereto, the act for treatment of alcoholism, K.S.A. 65-4001 et seq., and
amendments thereto, the act for treatment of drug abuse, K.S.A. 65-5201
et seq., and amendments thereto, or the care and treatment act for mentally
ill persons, K.S.A. 59-2945 et seq., and amendments thereto, the clerk
shall charge an additional fee of $1 which shall be deducted from the
docket fee and credited to the prosecuting attorneys' training fund as
provided in K.S.A. 28-170a, and amendments thereto.
(d) Except as provided further, the bond, lien or judgment fee
established in subsection (a) shall be the only fee collected or moneys in
the nature of a fee collected for such bond, lien or judgment. Such fee shall
only be established by an act of the legislature and no other authority is
established by law or otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019
2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an
additional charge, not to exceed $22 per bond, lien or judgment fee, to

HB 2393 24
fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
Sec. 8. K.S.A. 28-172a is hereby amended to read as follows: 28-
172a. (a) Except as otherwise provided in this section, whenever the
prosecuting witness or defendant is adjudged to pay the costs in a criminal
proceeding in any county, a docket fee shall be taxed as follows:
Murder or manslaughter................................................................... $180.50
Other felony........................................................................................ 171.00
Misdemeanor...................................................................................... 136.00
Forfeited recognizance......................................................................... 72.50
Appeals from other courts.................................................................... 72.50
(b) (1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), in actions involving the
violation of any of the laws of this state regulating traffic on highways,
including those listed in K.S.A. 8-2118(c), and amendments thereto, a
cigarette or tobacco infraction, any act declared a crime pursuant to the
statutes contained in chapter 32 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto, or any act declared a crime pursuant to the statutes
contained in article 8 of chapter 82a of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto, whenever the prosecuting witness or defendant is
adjudged to pay the costs in the action, a docket fee of $86 shall be
charged. When an action is disposed of under K.S.A. 8-2118(a) and (b), or
K.S.A. 79-3393(f), and amendments thereto, the docket fee to be paid as
court costs shall be $86.
(2) In actions involving the violation of a moving traffic violation
under K.S.A. 8-2118, and amendments thereto, as defined by rules and
regulations adopted under K.S.A. 8-249, and amendments thereto,
whenever the prosecuting witness or defendant is adjudged to pay the costs
in the action, a docket fee of $86 shall be charged. When an action is
disposed of under K.S.A. 8-2118(a) and (b), and amendments thereto, the
docket fee to be paid as court costs shall be $86.
(c) If a conviction is on more than one count, the docket fee shall be
the highest one applicable to any one of the counts. The prosecuting
witness or defendant, if assessed the costs, shall pay only one fee. Multiple
defendants shall each pay one fee.
(d) Statutory charges made pursuant to the provisions of K.S.A. 20-
362, and amendments thereto, shall be paid from the docket fee; the family
violence and child abuse and neglect assistance and prevention fund fee
shall be paid from criminal proceedings docket fees. All other fees and
expenses to be assessed as additional court costs shall be approved by the
court, unless specifically fixed by statute. Additional fees shall include, but
are not limited to, fees for Kansas bureau of investigation forensic or
laboratory analyses, fees for detention facility processing pursuant to
K.S.A. 12-16,119, and amendments thereto, fees for the sexual assault
evidence collection kit, fees for conducting an examination of a sexual

HB 2393 25
assault victim, fees for service of process outside the state, witness fees,
fees for transcripts and depositions, costs from other courts, doctors' fees
and examination and evaluation fees. No sheriff in this state shall charge
any district court of this state a fee or mileage for serving any paper or
process.
(e) In each case charging a violation of the laws relating to parking of
motor vehicles on the statehouse grounds or other state-owned or operated
property in Shawnee county, Kansas, as specified in K.S.A. 75-4510a, and
amendments thereto, or as specified in K.S.A. 75-4508, and amendments
thereto, the clerk shall tax a fee of $2 which shall constitute the entire costs
in the case, except that witness fees, mileage and expenses incurred in
serving a warrant shall be in addition to the fee. Appearance bond for a
parking violation of K.S.A. 75-4508 or 75-4510a, and amendments
thereto, shall be $3, unless a warrant is issued. The judge may order the
bond forfeited upon the defendant's failure to appear, and $2 of any bond
so forfeited shall be regarded as court costs.
(f) Except as provided further, the docket fee established in this
section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of
the legislature and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to
collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030,
the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $22 per
docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
Sec. 9. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 28-177 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 28-177. (a) Except as provided in this section and K.S.A. 28-178,
and amendments thereto, the fees established by legislative enactment
shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee collected
for court procedures. Such fee shall only be established by an act of the
legislature and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to
collect a fee. Court procedures shall include docket fees, filing fees or
other fees related to access to court procedures. On and after July 1, 2019
2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an
additional charge, not to exceed $26.50 per fee or the amount established
by the applicable statute, whichever amount is less, to fund the costs of
non-judicial personnel.
(b) Such additional charge imposed by the court pursuant to K.S.A. 8-
2107, 8-2110, 20-3021, 21-6614, 22-2410, 23-2510, 28-170, 28-172a, 28-
178, 28-179, 32-1049a, 38-2215, 38-2312, 38-2314, 59-104, 60-729, 60-
2001, 60-2203a, 61-2704, 61-4001 and 65-409 and K.S.A. 21-6614 and
23-2510, and amendments thereto, shall be remitted to the state treasurer
in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall
deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the state

HB 2393 26
general fund.
(c) There is hereby established in the state treasury the judicial branch
docket fee fund which shall be administered by the chief justice at the
Kansas supreme court. Moneys credited to the judicial branch docket fee
fund shall not be expended for compensation of judges or justices of the
judicial branch.
(d) All expenditures from the judicial branch docket fee fund shall be
made in accordance with appropriation acts and upon warrants of the
director of accounts and reports issued pursuant to vouchers approved by
the chief justice of the Kansas supreme court or by a person or persons
designated by the chief justice.
Sec. 10. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 28-178 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 28-178. (a) In addition to any other fees specifically prescribed by
law, on and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the
supreme court may impose a charge, not to exceed $12.50 per fee, to fund
the costs of non-judicial personnel, on the following:
(1) A person who requests an order or writ of execution pursuant to
K.S.A. 60-2401 or 61-3602, and amendments thereto.
(2) Persons who request a hearing in aid of execution pursuant to
K.S.A. 60-2419, and amendments thereto.
(3) A person requesting an order for garnishment pursuant to article 7
of chapter 60 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto,
or article 35 of chapter 61 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and
amendments thereto.
(4) Persons who request a writ or order of sale pursuant to K.S.A. 60-
2401 or 61-3602, and amendments thereto.
(5) A person who requests a hearing in aid of execution pursuant to
K.S.A. 61-3604, and amendments thereto.
(6) A person who requests an attachment against the property of a
defendant or any one or more of several defendants pursuant to K.S.A. 60-
701 or 61-3501, and amendments thereto.
(b) The clerk of the district court shall remit all revenues received
from the fees imposed pursuant to subsection (a) to the state treasurer, in
accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215, and amendments
thereto. Upon receipt of each such remittance, the state treasurer shall
deposit the entire amount in the state treasury to the credit of the state
general fund.
(c) The fees established in this section shall be the only fee collected
or moneys in the nature of a fee collected for such court procedures. Such
fee shall only be established by an act of the legislature and no other
authority is established by law or otherwise to collect a fee.
Sec. 11. K.S.A. 28-179 is hereby amended to read as follows: 28-179.
(a) No post-decree motion petitioning for a modification or termination of

HB 2393 27
separate maintenance, for a change in legal custody, residency, visitation
rights or parenting time or for a modification of child support shall be filed
or docketed in the district court without payment of a docket fee in the
amount of $40 to the clerk of the district court.
(b) A poverty affidavit may be filed in lieu of a docket fee as
established in K.S.A. 60-2001, and amendments thereto.
(c) The docket fee shall be the only costs assessed in each case for
services of the clerk of the district court and the sheriff. The docket fee
shall be disbursed in accordance with K.S.A. 20-362, and amendments
thereto.
(d) Except as provided further, the docket fee established in this
section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of
the legislature and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to
collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030,
the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $22 per
docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
Sec. 12. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 32-1049a is hereby amended to read as
follows: 32-1049a. (a) (1) Failure to comply with a wildlife and parks
citation means failure to:
(A) Appear before any district court in response to a wildlife and
parks citation and pay in full any fine, court costs, assessments or fees
imposed;
(B) fully pay or satisfy all fines, court costs, assessments or fees
imposed as a part of the sentence of any district court for violation of the
wildlife and parks laws of this state; or
(C) otherwise comply with a wildlife and parks citation as provided
in K.S.A. 32-1049, and amendments thereto.
(2) Failure to comply with a wildlife and parks citation is a class C
nonperson misdemeanor, regardless of the disposition of the charge for
which such citation, complaint or charge was originally issued.
(b) The term "citation" means any complaint, summons, notice to
appear, ticket, warrant, penalty assessment or other official document
issued for the prosecution of the wildlife and parks laws or rules and
regulations of this state.
(c) In addition to penalties of law applicable under subsection (a)
when a person fails to comply with a wildlife and parks citation or
sentence for a violation of wildlife and parks laws or rules and regulations,
the district court in which the person should have complied shall mail a
notice to the person that if the person does not appear in the district court
or pay all fines, court costs, assessments or fees, and any penalties
imposed within 30 days from the date of mailing, the Kansas department
of wildlife and parks shall be notified to forfeit or suspend any license,

HB 2393 28
permit, stamp or other issue of the department. Upon receipt of a report of
a failure to comply with a wildlife and parks citation under this section,
and amendments thereto, the department shall notify the violator and
suspend or forfeit the license, permit, stamp or other issue of the
department held by the violator until satisfactory evidence of compliance
with the wildlife and parks citation or sentence of the district court for
violation of the wildlife and parks laws or rules and regulations of this
state are furnished to the informing court. Upon receipt of notification of
such compliance from the informing court, the department shall terminate
the suspension action, unless the violator is otherwise suspended.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), when the district court
notifies the department of a failure to comply with a wildlife and parks
citation or failure to comply with a sentence of the district court imposed
on violation of a wildlife and parks law or rule and regulation, the court
shall assess a reinstatement fee of $50 for each charge or sentence on
which the person failed to make satisfaction, regardless of the disposition
of the charge for which such citation was originally issued. Such
reinstatement fee shall be in addition to any fine, court costs and other
assessments, fees or penalties. The court shall remit all reinstatement fees
to the state treasurer in accordance with the provisions of K.S.A. 75-4215,
and amendments thereto. Upon receipt of each remittance, the state
treasurer shall deposit the entire amount in the state treasury and shall
credit such moneys to the state general fund.
(e) The district court shall waive the reinstatement fee provided for in
subsection (d), if the failure to comply with a wildlife and parks citation
was the result of such person enlisting in or being drafted into the armed
services of the United States of America, being called into service as a
member of a reserve component of the military service of the United
States of America, or volunteering for such active duty or being called into
service as a member of the Kansas national guard or volunteering for such
active duty and being absent from Kansas because of such military service.
The state treasurer and the director of accounts and reports shall prescribe
procedures for all such reimbursement payments and shall create
appropriate accounts, make appropriate accounting entries and issue such
appropriate vouchers and warrants as may be required to make such
reimbursement payments.
(f) Except as provided further, the reinstatement fee established in
subsection (d) shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a
fee collected for such reinstatement. Such fee shall only be established by
an act of the legislature and no other authority is established by law or
otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June
30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to
exceed $22 per reinstatement fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial

HB 2393 29
personnel.
Sec. 13. K.S.A. 38-2215 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
2215. (a) Docket fee. The docket fee for proceedings under this code, if
one is assessed as provided in this section, shall be $34. Only one docket
fee shall be assessed in each case. Except as provided further, the docket
fee established in this section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in
the nature of a fee collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be
established by an act of the legislature and no other authority is established
by law or otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025,
through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an additional
charge, not to exceed $22 per docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial
personnel.
(b) Expenses. The expenses for proceedings under this code,
including fees and mileage allowed witnesses and fees and expenses
approved by the court for appointed attorneys, shall be paid by the board
of county commissioners from the general fund of the county.
(c) Assessment of docket fee and expenses. (1) Docket fee. The docket
fee may be assessed or waived by the court conducting the initial
dispositional hearing and the docket fee may be assessed against the
complaining witness or person initiating the proceedings or a party or
interested party other than the state, a political subdivision of the state, an
agency of the state or of a political subdivision of the state, or a person
acting in the capacity of an employee of the state or of a political
subdivision of the state. Any docket fee received shall be remitted to the
state treasurer pursuant to K.S.A. 20-362, and amendments thereto.
(2) Expenses. Expenses may be assessed against the complaining
witness, a person initiating the proceedings, a party or an interested party,
other than the state, a political subdivision of the state, an agency of the
state or of a political subdivision of the state or a person acting in the
capacity of an employee of the state or of a political subdivision of the
state. When expenses are recovered from a person against whom they have
been assessed the general fund of the county shall be reimbursed in the
amount of the recovery. If it appears to the court in any proceedings under
this code that expenses were unreasonably incurred at the request of any
party the court may assess that portion of the expenses against the party.
(d) Cases in which venue is transferred. If venue is transferred from
one county to another, the court from which the case is transferred shall
send to the receiving court a statement of expenses paid from the general
fund of the sending county. If the receiving court collects any of the
expenses owed in the case, the receiving court shall pay to the sending
court an amount proportional to the sending court's share of the total
expenses owed to both counties. The expenses of the sending county shall
not be an obligation of the receiving county except to the extent that the

HB 2393 30
sending county's proportion of the expenses is collected by the receiving
court. All amounts collected shall first be applied toward payment of the
docket fee.
Sec. 14. K.S.A. 38-2312 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
2312. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b) and (c), any records or files
specified in this code concerning a juvenile may be expunged upon
application to a judge of the court of the county in which the records or
files are maintained. The application for expungement may be made by the
juvenile, if 18 years of age or older or, if the juvenile is less than 18 years
of age, by the juvenile's parent or next friend.
(b) There shall be no expungement of records or files concerning acts
committed by a juvenile which, if committed by an adult, would constitute
a violation of K.S.A. 21-3401, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5402, and
amendments thereto, murder in the first degree; K.S.A. 21-3402, prior to
its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5403, and amendments thereto, murder in the
second degree; K.S.A. 21-3403, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5404, and
amendments thereto, voluntary manslaughter; K.S.A. 21-3404, prior to its
repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5405, and amendments thereto, involuntary
manslaughter; K.S.A. 21-3439, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5401, and
amendments thereto, capital murder; K.S.A. 21-3442, prior to its repeal, or
K.S.A. 21-5405(a)(3) or (a)(5), and amendments thereto, involuntary
manslaughter while driving under the influence of alcohol or drugs; K.S.A.
21-3502, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5503, and amendments thereto,
rape; K.S.A. 21-3503, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5506(a), and
amendments thereto, indecent liberties with a child; K.S.A. 21-3504, prior
to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5506(b), and amendments thereto, aggravated
indecent liberties with a child; K.S.A. 21-3506, prior to its repeal, or
K.S.A. 21-5504(b), and amendments thereto, aggravated criminal sodomy;
K.S.A. 21-3510, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5508(a), and amendments
thereto, indecent solicitation of a child; K.S.A. 21-3511, prior to its repeal,
or K.S.A. 21-5508(b), and amendments thereto, aggravated indecent
solicitation of a child; K.S.A. 21-3516, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-
5510, and amendments thereto, sexual exploitation of a child; K.S.A. 21-
5514(a), and amendments thereto, internet trading in child pornography;
K.S.A. 21-5514(b), and amendments thereto, aggravated internet trading in
child pornography; K.S.A. 21-3603, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-
5604(b), and amendments thereto, aggravated incest; K.S.A. 21-3608,
prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-5601(a), and amendments thereto,
endangering a child; K.S.A. 21-3609, prior to its repeal, or K.S.A. 21-
5602, and amendments thereto, abuse of a child; or which would constitute
an attempt to commit a violation of any of the offenses specified in this
subsection.
(c) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, for any offender

HB 2393 31
who is required to register as provided in the Kansas offender registration
act, K.S.A. 22-4901 et seq., and amendments thereto, there shall be no
expungement of any conviction or any part of the offender's criminal
record while the offender is required to register as provided in the Kansas
offender registration act.
(d) When a petition for expungement is filed, the court shall set a date
for a hearing on the petition and shall give notice thereof to the county or
district attorney. The petition shall state: (1) The juvenile's full name; (2)
the full name of the juvenile as reflected in the court record, if different
than (1); (3) the juvenile's sex and date of birth; (4) the offense for which
the juvenile was adjudicated; (5) the date of the trial; and (6) the identity
of the trial court. Except as otherwise provided by law, a petition for
expungement shall be accompanied by a docket fee in the amount of $176.
On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme
court may impose a charge, not to exceed $19 per case, to fund the costs of
non-judicial personnel. All petitions for expungement shall be docketed in
the original action. Any person who may have relevant information about
the petitioner may testify at the hearing. The court may inquire into the
background of the petitioner.
(e) (1) After hearing, the court shall order the expungement of the
records and files if the court finds that:
(A) (i) The juvenile has reached 23 years of age or that two years
have elapsed since the final discharge;
(ii) one year has elapsed since the final discharge for an adjudication
concerning acts committed by a juvenile which, if committed by an adult,
would constitute a violation of K.S.A. 21-6419, and amendments thereto;
or
(iii) the juvenile is a victim of human trafficking, aggravated human
trafficking or commercial sexual exploitation of a child, the adjudication
concerned acts committed by the juvenile as a result of such victimization,
including, but not limited to, acts which, if committed by an adult, would
constitute a violation of K.S.A. 21-6203 or 21-6419, and amendments
thereto, and the hearing on expungement occurred on or after the date of
final discharge. The provisions of this clause shall not allow an
expungement of records or files concerning acts described in subsection
(b);
(B) since the final discharge of the juvenile, the juvenile has not been
convicted of a felony or of a misdemeanor other than a traffic offense or
adjudicated as a juvenile offender under the revised Kansas juvenile justice
code and no proceedings are pending seeking such a conviction or
adjudication; and
(C) the circumstances and behavior of the petitioner warrant
expungement.

HB 2393 32
(2) The court may require that all court costs, fees and restitution
shall be paid.
(f) Upon entry of an order expunging records or files, the offense
which the records or files concern shall be treated as if it never occurred,
except that upon conviction of a crime or adjudication in a subsequent
action under this code the offense may be considered in determining the
sentence to be imposed. The petitioner, the court and all law enforcement
officers and other public offices and agencies shall properly reply on
inquiry that no record or file exists with respect to the juvenile. Inspection
of the expunged files or records thereafter may be permitted by order of
the court upon petition by the person who is the subject thereof. The
inspection shall be limited to inspection by the person who is the subject of
the files or records and the person's designees.
(g) A certified copy of any order made pursuant to subsection (a) or
(d) shall be sent to the Kansas bureau of investigation, which shall notify
every juvenile or criminal justice agency which may possess records or
files ordered to be expunged. If the agency fails to comply with the order
within a reasonable time after its receipt, such agency may be adjudged in
contempt of court and punished accordingly.
(h) The court shall inform any juvenile who has been adjudicated a
juvenile offender of the provisions of this section.
(i) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit the
maintenance of information relating to an offense after records or files
concerning the offense have been expunged if the information is kept in a
manner that does not enable identification of the juvenile.
(j) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit or require
expungement of files or records related to a child support order registered
pursuant to the revised Kansas juvenile justice code.
(k) Whenever the records or files of any adjudication have been
expunged under the provisions of this section, the custodian of the records
or files of adjudication relating to that offense shall not disclose the
existence of such records or files, except when requested by:
(1) The person whose record was expunged;
(2) a private detective agency or a private patrol operator, and the
request is accompanied by a statement that the request is being made in
conjunction with an application for employment with such agency or
operator by the person whose record has been expunged;
(3) a court, upon a showing of a subsequent conviction of the person
whose record has been expunged;
(4) the secretary for aging and disability services, or a designee of the
secretary, for the purpose of obtaining information relating to employment
in an institution, as defined in K.S.A. 76-12a01, and amendments thereto,
of the Kansas department for aging and disability services of any person

HB 2393 33
whose record has been expunged;
(5) a person entitled to such information pursuant to the terms of the
expungement order;
(6) the Kansas lottery, and the request is accompanied by a statement
that the request is being made to aid in determining qualifications for
employment with the Kansas lottery or for work in sensitive areas within
the Kansas lottery as deemed appropriate by the executive director of the
Kansas lottery;
(7) the governor or the Kansas racing commission, or a designee of
the commission, and the request is accompanied by a statement that the
request is being made to aid in determining qualifications for executive
director of the commission, for employment with the commission, for
work in sensitive areas in parimutuel racing as deemed appropriate by the
executive director of the commission or for licensure, renewal of licensure
or continued licensure by the commission;
(8) the Kansas sentencing commission; or
(9) the Kansas bureau of investigation, for the purposes of:
(A) Completing a person's criminal history record information within
the central repository in accordance with K.S.A. 22-4701 et seq., and
amendments thereto; or
(B) providing information or documentation to the federal bureau of
investigation, in connection with the national instant criminal background
check system, to determine a person's qualification to possess a firearm.
(l) The provisions of subsection (k)(9) shall apply to all records
created prior to, on and after July 1, 2011.
Sec. 15. K.S.A. 38-2314 is hereby amended to read as follows: 38-
2314. (a) Docket fee. The docket fee for proceedings under this code, if
one is assessed as provided by this section, shall be $34. Only one docket
fee shall be assessed in each case. Except as provided further, the docket
fee established in this section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in
the nature of a fee collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be
established by an act of the legislature and no other authority is established
by law or otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025,
through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an additional
charge, not to exceed $22 per docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial
personnel.
(b) Expenses. The expenses for proceedings under this code,
including fees and mileage allowed witnesses and fees and expenses
approved by the court for appointed attorneys, shall be paid by the board
of county commissioners from the general fund of the county.
(c) Assessment of docket fee and expenses. (1) Docket fee. The docket
fee may be assessed or waived by the court conducting the initial
sentencing hearing and may be assessed against the juvenile or the parent

HB 2393 34
of the juvenile. Any docket fee received shall be remitted to the state
treasurer pursuant to K.S.A. 20-362, and amendments thereto.
(2) Expenses. Expenses may be waived or assessed against the
juvenile or a parent of the juvenile. When expenses are recovered from a
party against whom they have been assessed the general fund of the county
shall be reimbursed in the amount of the recovery.
(3) Prohibited assessment. Docket fees or expenses shall not be
assessed against the state, a political subdivision of the state, an agency of
the state or of a political subdivision of the state or a person acting in the
capacity of an employee of the state or of a political subdivision of the
state.
(d) Cases in which venue is transferred. If venue is transferred from
one county to another, the court from which the case is transferred shall
send to the receiving court a statement of expenses paid from the general
fund of the sending county. If the receiving court collects any of the
expenses owed in the case, the receiving court shall pay to the sending
court an amount proportional to the sending court's share of the total
expenses owed to both counties. The expenses of the sending county shall
not be an obligation of the receiving county except to the extent that the
sending county's proportionate share of the expenses is collected by the
receiving court. Unless otherwise ordered by the court, all amounts
collected shall first be applied toward payment of restitution, then toward
the payment of the docket fee.
Sec. 16. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 59-104 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 59-104. (a) Docket fee. (1) Except as otherwise provided by law,
no case shall be filed or docketed in the district court under the provisions
of chapter 59 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated, and amendments thereto,
or of articles 40 and 52 of chapter 65 of the Kansas Statutes Annotated,
and amendments thereto, without payment of an appropriate docket fee as
follows:
Treatment of mentally ill.................................................................... $34.50
Treatment of alcoholism or drug abuse................................................ 34.50
Determination of descent of property................................................... 49.50
Termination of life estate...................................................................... 48.50
Termination of joint tenancy................................................................. 48.50
Refusal to grant letters of administration............................................. 48.50
Adoption............................................................................................... 48.50
Filing a will and affidavit under K.S.A. 59-618a, and
amendments thereto......................................................................... 48.50
Guardianship......................................................................................... 69.50
Conservatorship.................................................................................... 69.50
Trusteeship............................................................................................ 69.50
Combined guardianship and conservatorship....................................... 69.50

HB 2393 35
Certified probate proceedings under K.S.A. 59-213, and amendments
thereto.............................................................................................. 23.50
Decrees in probate from another state................................................ 173.00
Probate of an estate or of a will.......................................................... 109.50
Civil commitment under K.S.A. 59-29a01 et seq., and
amendments thereto......................................................................... 33.50
(2) Except as provided further, the docket fee established in this
section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of
the legislature and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to
collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030,
the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $22 per
docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
(b) Poverty affidavit in lieu of docket fee and exemptions. The
provisions of K.S.A. 60-2001(b) and K.S.A. 60-2005, and amendments
thereto, shall apply to probate docket fees prescribed by this section.
(c) Disposition of docket fee. Statutory charges for the law library and
for the prosecuting attorneys' training fund shall be paid from the docket
fee. The remainder of the docket fee shall be paid to the state treasurer in
accordance with K.S.A. 20-362, and amendments thereto.
(d) Additional court costs. Other fees and expenses to be assessed as
additional court costs shall be approved by the court, unless specifically
fixed by statute. Other fees shall include, but not be limited to, witness
fees, appraiser fees, fees for service of process outside the state, fees for
depositions, transcripts and publication of legal notice, executor or
administrator fees, attorney fees, court costs from other courts and any
other fees and expenses required by statute. All additional court costs shall
be taxed and billed against the parties or estate as directed by the court. No
sheriff in this state shall charge any district court in this state a fee or
mileage for serving any paper or process.
Sec. 17. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 60-729 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 60-729. (a) Garnishment is a procedure whereby the wages,
money or intangible property of a person can be seized or attached
pursuant to an order of garnishment issued by the court under the
conditions set forth in the order.
(b) Any party requesting an order of garnishment shall pay a fee in
the amount of $7.50 to the clerk of the district court.
(c) A poverty affidavit may be filed in lieu of a fee as established in
K.S.A. 60-2001, and amendments thereto.
(d) The fee shall be the only costs assessed in each case for services
of the clerk of the district court and the sheriff. The fee shall be disbursed
in accordance with K.S.A. 20-362, and amendments thereto.
(e) Except as provided further, the fee established in this section shall

HB 2393 36
be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee collected for the
docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of the legislature
and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to collect a fee.
On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme
court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $12.50 per fee, to
fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
(f) The state of Kansas and all municipalities in this state, as defined
in K.S.A. 12-105a, and amendments thereto, shall be exempt from paying
such fee.
Sec. 18. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 60-2001 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 60-2001. (a) Docket fee. Except as otherwise provided by law, no
case shall be filed or docketed in the district court, whether original or
appealed, without payment of a docket fee in the amount of $173 to the
clerk of the district court. Except as provided further, the docket fee
established in this subsection shall be the only fee collected or moneys in
the nature of a fee collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be
established by an act of the legislature and no other authority is established
by law or otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025,
through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an additional
charge, not to exceed $22 per docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial
personnel.
(b) Poverty affidavit in lieu of docket fee. (1) Effect. In any case
where a plaintiff by reason of poverty is unable to pay a docket fee, and an
affidavit so stating is filed, no fee will be required. An inmate in the
custody of the secretary of corrections may file a poverty affidavit only if
the inmate attaches a statement disclosing the average account balance, or
the total deposits, whichever is less, in the inmate's trust fund for each
month in: (A) The six-month period preceding the filing of the action; or
(B) the current period of incarceration, whichever is shorter. Such
statement shall be certified by the secretary. On receipt of the affidavit and
attached statement, the court shall determine the initial fee to be assessed
for filing the action and in no event shall the court require an inmate to pay
less than $3. The secretary of corrections is hereby authorized to disburse
money from the inmate's account to pay the costs as determined by the
court. If the inmate has a zero balance in such inmate's account, the
secretary shall debit such account in the amount of $3 per filing fee as
established by the court until money is credited to the account to pay such
docket fee. Any initial filing fees assessed pursuant to this subsection shall
not prevent the court, pursuant to subsection (d), from taxing that
individual for the remainder of the amount required under subsection (a) or
this subsection.
(2) Form of affidavit. The affidavit provided for in this subsection
shall set forth a factual basis upon which the plaintiff alleges by reason of

HB 2393 37
poverty an inability to pay a docket fee, including, but not limited to, the
source and amount of the plaintiff's weekly income. Such affidavit shall be
signed and sworn to by the plaintiff under oath, before one who has
authority to administer the oath, under penalty of perjury, K.S.A. 21-5903,
and amendments thereto. The form of the affidavit shall be deemed
sufficient if in substantial compliance with the form set forth by the
judicial council.
(3) Court review; grounds for dismissal; service of process. The court
shall review any petition authorized for filing under this subsection. Upon
such review, if the court finds that the plaintiff's allegation of poverty is
untrue, the court shall direct the plaintiff to pay the docket fee or dismiss
the petition without prejudice. Notwithstanding K.S.A. 60-301, and
amendments thereto, service of process shall not issue unless the court
grants leave following its review.
(c) Disposition of fees. The docket fees and the fees for service of
process shall be the only costs assessed in each case for services of the
clerk of the district court and the sheriff. For every person to be served by
the sheriff, the persons requesting service of process shall provide proper
payment to the clerk and the clerk of the district court shall forward the
service of process fee to the sheriff in accordance with K.S.A. 28-110, and
amendments thereto. The service of process fee, if paid by check or money
order, shall be made payable to the sheriff. Such service of process fee
shall be submitted by the sheriff at least monthly to the county treasurer
for deposit in the county treasury and credited to the county general fund.
The docket fee shall be disbursed in accordance with K.S.A. 20-362, and
amendments thereto.
(d) Additional court costs. Other fees and expenses to be assessed as
additional court costs shall be approved by the court, unless specifically
fixed by statute. Other fees shall include, but not be limited to, witness
fees, appraiser fees, fees for service of process, fees for depositions,
alternative dispute resolution fees, transcripts and publication, attorney
fees, court costs from other courts and any other fees and expenses
required by statute. All additional court costs shall be taxed and billed
against the parties as directed by the court. No sheriff in this state shall
charge any mileage for serving any papers or process.
Sec. 19. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 60-2203a is hereby amended to read as
follows: 60-2203a. (a) After the commencement of any action in any
district court of this state, or the courts of the United States in the state of
Kansas or in any action now pending heretofore commenced in such
courts, which does not involve title to real estate, any party to such action
may give notice in any other county of the state of the pendency of the
action by filing for record with the clerk of the district court of such other
county a verified statement setting forth the parties to the action, the nature

HB 2393 38
of the action, the court in which it is pending, and the relief sought, which
shall impart notice of the pendency of the action and shall result in the
same lien rights as if the action were pending in that county. The lien shall
be effective from the time the statement is filed, but not to exceed four
months prior to the entry of judgment except as provided in subsection (c)
(b). The party filing such notice shall within 30 days after any satisfaction
of the judgment entered in such action, or any other final disposition
thereof, cause to be filed with such clerk of the district court a notice that
all claims in such action are released. If the party filing fails or neglects to
do so after reasonable demand by any party in interest, such party shall be
liable in damages in the same amounts and manner as is provided by law
for failure of a mortgagee to enter satisfaction of a mortgage. Upon the
filing of such a notice of the pendency of an action the clerk shall charge a
fee of $14 and shall enter and index the action in the same manner as for
the filing of an original action. Upon the filing of a notice of release, the
notice shall likewise be entered on the docket. Except as provided further,
the fee established in this subsection shall be the only fee collected or
moneys in the nature of a fee collected for the court procedure. Such fee
shall only be established by an act of the legislature and no other authority
is established by law or otherwise to collect a fee. On and after July 1,
2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme court may impose an
additional charge, not to exceed $22 per fee, to fund the costs of non-
judicial personnel.
(b) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of this section, the
filing of a notice of the pendency of an action pursuant to subsection (a)
shall create no lien rights against the property of an employee of the state
or a municipality prior to the date judgment is rendered if the pleadings in
the pending action allege a negligent or wrongful act or omission of the
employee while acting within the scope of such employee's employment,
regardless of whether or not it is alleged in the alternative that the
employee was acting outside of such employee's employment. A judgment
against an employee shall become a lien upon such employee's property in
the county where notice is filed pursuant to subsection (a) when the
judgment is rendered only if it is found that: (1) The employee's negligent
or wrongful act or omission occurred when the employee was acting
outside the scope of such employee's employment; or (2) the employee's
conduct which gave rise to the judgment was because of actual fraud or
actual malice of the employee. In such cases the lien shall not be effective
prior to the date judgment was rendered. As used in this subsection (c),
"employee" shall have the meaning ascribed to such term in K.S.A. 75-
6102, and amendments thereto.
Sec. 20. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 61-2704 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 61-2704. (a) An action seeking the recovery of a small claim shall

HB 2393 39
be considered to have been commenced at the time a person files a written
statement of the person's small claim with the clerk of the court if, within
90 days after the small claim is filed, service of process is obtained or the
first publication is made for service by publication. Otherwise, the action
is deemed commenced at the time of service of process or first publication.
An entry of appearance shall have the same effect as service.
(b) Upon the filing of a plaintiff's small claim, the clerk of the court
shall require from the plaintiff a docket fee of $35 if the claim does not
exceed $500; or $55 if the claim exceeds $500; unless for good cause
shown the judge waives the fee. The docket fee shall be the only costs
required in an action seeking recovery of a small claim. No person may
file more than 20 small claims under this act in the same court during any
calendar year.
(c) Except as provided further, the docket fee established in this
section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of
the legislature and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to
collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030,
the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $12.50
per docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
Sec. 21. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 61-4001 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 61-4001. (a) Docket fee. (1) No case shall be filed or docketed
pursuant to the code of civil procedure for limited actions without the
payment of a docket fee in the amount of $35 if the amount in controversy
or claimed does not exceed $500; $55 if the amount in controversy or
claimed exceeds $500 but does not exceed $5,000; or $101 if the amount
in controversy or claimed exceeds $5,000. If judgment is rendered for the
plaintiff, the court also may enter judgment for the plaintiff for the amount
of the docket fee paid by the plaintiff.
(2) Except as provided further, the docket fee established in this
section shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee
collected for the docket fee. Such fee shall only be established by an act of
the legislature and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to
collect a fee. On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030,
the supreme court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $19 per
docket fee, to fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
(b) Poverty affidavit; additional court costs; exemptions for the state
and municipalities. The provisions of K.S.A. 60-2001(b), (c) and (d) and
60-2005, and amendments thereto, shall be applicable to lawsuits brought
under the code of civil procedure for limited actions.
Sec. 22. K.S.A. 2024 Supp. 65-409 is hereby amended to read as
follows: 65-409. (a) The clerk of the district court shall charge a fee of $14
for entering and filing a lien statement under this act.

HB 2393 40
(b) Except as provided further, the lien fee established in subsection
(a) shall be the only fee collected or moneys in the nature of a fee collected
for such lien. Such fee shall only be established by an act of the legislature
and no other authority is established by law or otherwise to collect a fee.
On and after July 1, 2019 2025, through June 30, 2025 2030, the supreme
court may impose an additional charge, not to exceed $22 per lien fee, to
fund the costs of non-judicial personnel.
Sec. 23. K.S.A. 8-2107, 20-3021, 21-6614, 22-2410, 23-2510, 28-
170, 28-172a, 28-179, 38-2215, 38-2312 and 38-2314 and K.S.A. 2024
Supp. 8-2110, 28-177, 28-178, 32-1049a, 59-104, 60-729, 60-2001, 60-
2203a, 61-2704, 61-4001 and 65-409 are hereby repealed.
Sec. 24. This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its
publication in the statute book.